Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.010

Board of trustees—Composition.

(1) The mayor or his or her designated representative who shall be an elected official of the city, and the clerk, treasurer, president of the city council or mayor pro tem of each city of the first class, or in case any such city has no city council, the commissioner who has supervision of the police department, together with three active or retired members of the police department, to be elected as herein provided, in addition to the duties now required of them, are constituted a board of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department of each such city, and shall provide for the disbursement of the fund, and designate the beneficiaries thereof.

(2) The police department and the retired law enforcement officers of each city of the first class shall elect three members to act as members of the board. Members shall be elected for three year terms. Existing members shall continue in office until replaced as provided for in this section.

(3) Such election shall be held in the following manner. Not more than thirty nor less than fifteen days preceding the first day of June in each year, written notice of the nomination of any member or retired member of the department for membership on the board may be filed with the secretary of the board. Each notice of nomination shall be signed by not less than five members or retired members of the department, and nothing herein contained shall prevent any member or retired member of the department from signing more than one notice of nomination. The election shall be held on a date to be fixed by the secretary during the month of June. Notice of the dates upon which notice of nomination may be filed and of the date fixed for the election of such members of the board shall be given by the secretary of the board by posting written notices thereof in a prominent place in the police headquarters. For the purpose of such election, the secretary of the board shall prepare and furnish printed or typewritten ballots in the usual form, containing the names of all persons regularly nominated for membership and shall furnish a ballot box for the election. Each member and each retired member of the police department shall be entitled to vote at the election for one nominee as a member of the board. The chief of the department shall appoint two members to act as officials of the election, who shall be allowed their regular wages for the day, but shall receive no additional compensation therefor. The election shall be held in the police headquarters of the department and the polls shall open at 7:30 a.m. and close at 8:30 p.m. The one nominee receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected to the board and his or her term shall commence on the first day of July succeeding the election. In the first election the nominee receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to the three year term, the second greatest to the two year term and the third greatest to the one year term. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the right to elect and the right to be elected under this section. Ballots shall contain all names of those nominated, both active and retired. Notice of nomination and voting by retired members shall be conducted by the board.

(4) If no eligible active or retired members of the police department are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (3) of this section, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under subsection (3) of this section:

(a) Any active or retired law enforcement officers who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board. This includes active and retired law enforcement officers under this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW;

(b) The widow or widower of a law enforcement officer subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

[ 2020 c 107 s 5; 2012 c 117 s 20; 1988 c 164 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 16 s 1; 1955 c 69 s 1; 1911 c 18 s 1; 1909 c 39 s 1; RRS s 9579.]